Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 2. Reciprocity.

Sec. 43.10.070.
Reciprocity in collection of taxes.

The courts of the state shall recognize and enforce the liability for taxes lawfully imposed by the laws of every state or territory which extends a like comity in respect to the liability for taxes lawfully imposed by the laws of this state. The officials of a state or territory may bring action in the courts of this state for the collection of their taxes. The certificate of the secretary of state of the other state or territory that the officials have the authority to collect the taxes sought to be collected by the action is conclusive proof of that authority.

The attorney general may bring action in the courts of other states or territories to collect taxes due the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 1955)

Sec. 43.10.080.
Definition of taxes.

In AS

43.10.070

, “taxes” includes

tax and license assessments lawfully made, whether they are based upon a return or other disclosure of the taxpayer, upon the information and belief of the taxing authority, or otherwise;

penalties lawfully imposed under a taxing or licensing statute;

interest charges lawfully added to the tax liability which constitutes the subject of the action.

History.

(§ 2 ch 41 SLA 1955)

Secs. 43.10.090
— 43.10.150.
Uniform Federal Tax Lien Registration Act. [Repealed, § 43 ch 161 SLA 1988. For current law see, AS 40.19.]